Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1295
Certificate
of title; disclosures required.

A certificate
of title which is issued on or after January 1, 2005, shall disclose in writing,
from any records readily accessible to the Department of Motor Vehicles or
county officials or a peace officer, anything which
indicates that the motorboat was previously issued a title in another jurisdiction
that bore any word or symbol signifying that the motorboat was damaged, including,
but not limited to, older model salvage, unrebuildable, parts only, scrap,
junk, nonrepairable, reconstructed, rebuilt, flood damaged, damaged, or any
other indication, symbol, or word of like kind, and the name of the jurisdiction
issuing the previous title.

Laws 2004, LB 560, § 8;

Laws 2011, LB667, § 20.